Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-503
Fund balances; disposition.

The balances remaining in any of the funds created by sections 14-501 and 14-502 and against which lawful obligations have not been created shall at the expiration of each fiscal year or biennial period be transferred to the general sinking fund of the city by the department of finance.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. IV, § 3, p. 470;

C.S.1922, § 3626;

C.S.1929, § 14-503;

R.S.1943, § 14-503;

Laws 2000, LB 1116, § 12;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 154.
July 21, 2022